Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2186.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 63ACCESSORY DWELLING UNITSSec.6301. Definitions.6302. Permitted use by right.6303. Adoption of ordinance.6304 6303 . Application. 6305 6304 . Attached or detached unit. 6306 6305 . Restrictions on accessory dwelling units. 6307 6306 . Conformity. <--<--<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617 § 6301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Accessory dwelling unit."(1) A residential living unit:(i) on a parcel or lot on which a single-family dwelling RESIDENTIAL BUILDING is present or may be constructed;(ii) that provides complete independent living facilities for one or more individuals; and(iii) that includes, but is not limited to:(A) an attached or detached unit;(B) a unit that is part of an accessory structure, including a detached garage; or(C) a unit that is not part of an expanded or remodeled dwelling.(2) The term does not include a recreational vehicle."Dwelling unit." A residential living unit that provides complete independent living facilities for one or more individuals and includes permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking and sanitation."Municipality." A city, borough, incorporated town, township, home rule municipality, optional plan municipality or optional charter municipality, located in this Commonwealth."Planned community." As defined under 68 Pa.C.S. § 5103 (relating to definitions)."Recreational vehicle." As defined under 75 Pa.C.S. § 9602 (relating to definitions)."Single-family detached dwelling unit." A freestanding 20260HB2186PN3173 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 building containing one dwelling unit for one family."RESIDENTIAL BUILDING." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 103 OF THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 10, 1999 (P.L.491, NO.45), KNOWN AS THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSTRUCTION CODE ACT.§ 6302. Permitted use by right.An accessory dwelling unit shall be a permitted use by right in every municipality WITH ZONING in which a single-family detached dwelling unit RESIDENTIAL BUILDING is a permitted use, except that the permission may not supersede any deed restriction, covenant or agreement restricting the use of land or any master deed, bylaw or other document applicable to a planned community.§ 6303. Adoption of ordinance.A municipality shall adopt an ordinance to permit the development of at least one accessory dwelling unit for each single-family detached dwelling unit, subject to reasonable regulation that is the least restrictive means of accomplishing the goal of the regulation.§ 6304 6303 . Application. (a) Process.--The following application process shall apply for an accessory dwelling unit:(1) A permit application for an accessory dwelling unit shall be considered and approved without discretionary review or a hearing.(2) The municipality shall approve or deny an application to create or serve an accessory dwelling unit within:(i) 30 days from the date the municipality receives the completed application; or(ii) 60 days if additional review is required.20260HB2186PN3173 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) If the permit application to create or serve an accessory dwelling unit is submitted with a permit application to create or serve a new single-family dwelling unit on the lot, the municipality may delay approving or denying the permit application for the accessory dwelling unit until the municipality approves or denies the permit application to create or serve the new single-family dwelling unit.(4) If the applicant requests a delay, the time period provided under paragraph (2) shall be tolled for the period of the delay.(5) If the municipality has not approved or denied the completed application within the time period provided under paragraph (2), the application shall be deemed approved.(6) A municipality may charge a fee, which shall not exceed $250 in the aggregate, for costs incurred to review the permit application for the creation or service of an accessory dwelling unit.(7) A municipality may not require a renewal for a permit for an accessory dwelling unit.(b) Denial of application.--If a municipality denies an application for an accessory dwelling unit, the municipality shall return in writing a full set of comments to the applicant with a list of items that are defective or deficient and a description of how the applicant may remedy the application.CONSIDERATION OF APPLICATIONS AND INSPECTIONS SHALL BE AS PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 502 OF THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 10, 1999 (P.L.491, NO.45), KNOWN AS THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSTRUCTION CODE ACT.§ 6305 6304 . Attached or detached unit. 20260HB2186PN3173 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Accessory dwelling units may be:(1) attached to, or located within, a proposed or existing single-family detached dwelling unit RESIDENTIAL BUILDING ; or (2) detached from a proposed or existing single-family detached dwelling unit RESIDENTIAL BUILDING if located on the same lot as the dwelling RESIDENTIAL BUILDING . § 6306 6305 . Restrictions on accessory dwelling units. The following restrictions shall apply to an accessory dwelling unit:(1) A municipality may not establish a minimum net floor area for an accessory dwelling unit of more than 150 200 square feet.(2) A municipality may establish a maximum net floor area for an accessory dwelling unit of not less than 50% of the net floor area of the single-family detached dwelling unit or 1,250 RESIDENTIAL BUILDING OR 850 square feet, whichever is less, or the entire floor plate of a basement or attic.(3) A municipality may establish a height limitation for an accessory dwelling unit of no less than 25 feet or the height of the single-family detached dwelling unit RESIDENTIAL BUILDING , whichever is less. (4) A municipality may not establish a minimum allowance for building cover or impervious cover for an accessory dwelling unit of less than 600 200 square feet. (5) A municipality may not require an accessory dwelling unit to meet storm water or water quality standards that a single-family detached dwelling unit RESIDENTIAL BUILDING on the same lot is not required to meet.20260HB2186PN3173 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) A setback shall not be required for an existing living area or accessory structure or for a structure constructed in the same location and to the same dimensions as an existing structure that is converted to an accessory dwelling unit or for a portion of an accessory dwelling unit. A setback of no more than four feet from the side and rear lot lines may be required for an accessory dwelling unit that is not converted from an existing structure or a new structure constructed in the same location and to the same dimensions as an existing structure.(7) A zoning ordinance may not impose building material, architectural design, color or similar requirements on an accessory dwelling unit that are more restrictive than the requirements applicable to the single-family detached dwelling RESIDENTIAL BUILDING on the same lot. (8) A municipality may not require a passageway between an accessory dwelling unit and a single-family detached dwelling unit RESIDENTIAL BUILDING , except as required by the applicable building or fire code.(9) A municipality shall not condition the approval of an accessory dwelling unit on the correction of a nonconforming use, structure or lot or require the installation of fire sprinklers in an accessory dwelling unit if the sprinklers are not required for the single-family detached dwelling unit RESIDENTIAL BUILDING located on the same lot.(10) A municipality, municipal authority or public utility:(i) may not consider an accessory dwelling unit to be a new residential use for the purposes of calculating 20260HB2186PN3173 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 connection fees or capacity charges for utilities, including water and sewer service, unless the accessory dwelling unit was constructed with a new single-family dwelling unit on the same lot; and(ii) shall not be required to install a new or separate utility connection directly to an accessory dwelling unit or impose a related connection fee or capacity charge.(11) (10) A municipality may not require owner-occupancy requirements of either the single-family detached dwelling unit RESIDENTIAL BUILDING or the accessory dwelling unit. (12) (11) A municipality may not require a familial relationship between the occupant of an accessory dwelling unit and the occupant of the single-family detached dwelling unit RESIDENTIAL BUILDING . (13) (12) A municipality shall allow an accessory dwelling unit to be rented separate from the single-family detached dwelling unit RESIDENTIAL BUILDING , but may prohibit the sale or other conveyance of an accessory dwelling UNIT separate from the single-family dwelling unit RESIDENTIAL BUILDING . (14) (13) Additional off-street parking shall not be required for the construction of an accessory dwelling unit. If a garage, carport or covered parking structure is demolished in conjunction with the construction of an accessory dwelling unit or converted to an accessory dwelling unit, a municipality may not require those off-street parking spaces to be replaced.§ 6307 6306 . Conformity. An accessory dwelling unit that conforms to the requirements 20260HB2186PN3173 - 7 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and limitations of this chapter shall be deemed to be:(1) an accessory use or an accessory building and shall not be considered to exceed the allowable density for the lot upon which it is located; and(2) a residential use that is consistent with the existing general plan and zoning designations for the lot.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2186PN3173 - 8 - 1234567